Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-2486
Act, purpose.

The purpose of the Opioid Prevention and Treatment Act is to provide for the use of dedicated revenue for opioid-disorder-related treatment, prevention, and remediation and research regarding opioid treatment, prevention, and remediation, in accordance with the terms of any verdict, judgment, compromise, or settlement that is the source of such revenue.

Laws 2020, LB1124, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB1355, § 5.